Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-48] Absent and additional members.
(a) No member of a general or special court-martial may be absent or excused
after the accused has been arraigned except for physical disability or as the
result of a challenge or by order of the convening authority for good cause.

(b) Whenever a general court-martial is
reduced below five members, the trial may not proceed unless the convening
authority details new members sufficient in number to provide not less than
five members. When the new members have been sworn, the trial may proceed
after the recorded testimony of each witness previously examined has been read
to the court in the presence of the law officer, the accused, and counsel.

(c) Whenever a special court-martial is
reduced below three members, the trial may not proceed unless the convening
authority details new members sufficient in number to provide not less than
three members. When the new members have been sworn, the trial shall proceed
as if no evidence has previously been introduced, unless a verbatim record of
the testimony of previously examined witnesses or a stipulation thereof is read
to the court in the presence of the accused and counsel. [L 1982, c 171, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next